Massachusetts, session 194th, S2616.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32E of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
A lessor shall provide and maintain, during such time as the lessor engages in the
business of leasing motor vehicles under any system referred to in section 32C, a motor vehicle
liability policy or bond or deposit, on a secondary or contingent basis, equal to not less than the
financial requirements imposed on owners or registrants in the commonwealth if the lessee or
operator does not have a motor vehicle liability policy or other coverage, which, in addition to
providing indemnity, protection or security for personal injuries, shall, except in the case of
vehicles leased for a term of more than 30 days, further provide indemnity, protection or security
for damage to property as required by this chapter. If the lessee or operator holds a valid and
collectible liability policy or other form of financial security which satisfies the minimum
of 2

financial requirements imposed on owners or registrants in the commonwealth, a lessor’s
obligation under this section shall be satisfied.
SECTION 2. Section 34M of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 2, the words “thirty-four A” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- 34A or as required under section 32E.
SECTION 3. Said section 34M of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 32, the words “section thirty-four A” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- sections 34A or 32E.
of 2